Utah statutes.
59-12-102.3.   Authority to enter into agreement -- Delegates.
(1)  The commission may apply to the governing board for the state to become a
party to the agreement.
(2)  If the state becomes a party to the agreement, the commission may:
(a)  establish standards for certification of a:
(i)  certified automated system; and
(ii)  certified service provider;
(b)  act jointly with other states that are parties to the agreement to
establish performance standards for multistate sellers; and
(c)  take other actions reasonably required to implement provisions of the
agreement:
(i)  if those actions are not in conflict with statute; and
(ii)  subject to Subsection (1)(c)(i), including:
(A)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, adopting administrative rules; and
(B)  in furtherance of the agreement, jointly procuring goods or services with
other states that are parties to the agreement.
(3)  Subject to Subsection (4), delegates shall be appointed to the governing
board of the agreement to:
(a)  assist in implementing the provisions of the agreement; and
(b)  address other matters as determined by the governing board.
(4)  Delegates shall be appointed as follows:
(a)  one delegate shall be a member of the House of Representatives appointed
by the speaker of the House of Representatives;
(b)  one delegate shall be a member of the Senate appointed by the president
of the Senate; and
(c)  two delegates shall be appointed by the governor, at least one of whom
shall be from the commission.
